Nebraska, session 109, LB103.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 27-412, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
27-412 (1) The following evidence is not admissible in any civil or
criminal proceeding involving alleged sexual misconduct except as provided in
subsections (2) and (3) of this section:
(a) Evidence offered to prove that any victim engaged in other sexual
behavior or has been the victim of any other sexual assault; and
(b) Evidence offered to prove any victim's sexual predisposition.
(2)(a) In a criminal case, the following evidence is admissible, if
otherwise admissible under the Nebraska Evidence Rules:
(i) Evidence of specific instances of sexual behavior by the victim
offered to prove that a person other than the accused was the source of semen,
injury, or other physical evidence;
(ii) Evidence of specific instances of sexual behavior of the victim with
respect to the accused offered by the accused to prove consent of the victim if
it is first established to the court that such behavior is similar to the
behavior involved in the case and tends to establish a pattern of behavior of
the victim relevant to the issue of consent; and
(iii) Evidence, the exclusion of which would violate the constitutional
rights of the accused.
(b) In a civil case, evidence offered to prove the sexual behavior or
sexual predisposition of any victim is admissible if it is otherwise admissible
under the Nebraska Evidence Rules and its probative value substantially
outweighs the danger of harm to any victim and of unfair prejudice to any
party. Evidence of a victim's reputation is admissible only if it has been
placed in controversy by the victim.
(3)(a) A party intending to offer evidence under subsection (2) of this
section shall:
(i) File a written motion at least fifteen days before trial specifically
describing the evidence and stating the purpose for which it is offered unless
the court, for good cause, requires a different time for filing or permits
filing during trial; and
(ii) Serve the motion on all parties and notify the victim or, when
appropriate, the victim's guardian or representative.
(b) Before admitting evidence under this section, the court shall conduct
a hearing in camera outside the presence of any jury.
(4) Evidence of the victim's consent is not admissible in any civil
proceeding involving alleged:
(a) Sexual penetration when the actor is nineteen years of age or older
and the victim is less than sixteen years of age; or
(b) Sexual contact when the actor is nineteen years of age or older and
the victim is less than fifteen years of age.
Sec. 2. Section 29-1917, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
29-1917 (1) Except as provided in section 29-1926, at any time after the
filing of an indictment or information in a felony prosecution, the prosecuting
attorney or the defendant may request the court to allow the taking of a
deposition of any person other than the defendant who may be a witness in the
trial of the offense. The court may order the taking of the deposition when it
finds the testimony of the witness:
(a) May be material or relevant to the issue to be determined at the trial
of the offense; or
(b) May be of assistance to the parties in the preparation of their
respective cases.
(2) An order granting the taking of a deposition shall include the time
and place for taking such deposition and such other conditions as the court
determines to be just.
(3) Except as provided in subsections subsection (4) and (5) of this
section, the proceedings in taking the deposition of a witness pursuant to this
section and returning it to the court shall be governed in all respects as the
taking of depositions in civil cases, including section 25-1223.
(4)(a) If the prosecuting attorney or defendant seeks to question a
witness at a deposition under this section regarding evidence admissible under
subsection (2) of section 27-412 or regarding a prior alleged false allegation
of sexual assault, such party shall state notice of intent to do so in the
motion to depose the witness. Such notice shall not include the name or any
-1-

LB103 LB103
2026 2026
identifying information of the witness, nor the grounds upon which the moving
party believes such evidence may be relevant and admissible.
(b) If the opposing party objects to questioning described in subdivision
(4)(a) of this section, such party shall file a written objection. Such written
objection shall not include the name or identifying information of the witness,
nor the grounds upon which that party believes the evidence is not relevant or
admissible.
(c) Upon the filing of an objection under subdivision (4)(b) of this
section, the court shall conduct an in camera hearing regarding such motion.
Only the parties shall be permitted to be present at such hearing. The record
of such hearing shall be sealed and preserved to be made available to the
appellate court in the event of an appeal, and the contents shall not otherwise
be revealed without a court order. Such hearing shall be conducted no fewer
than seven days before any scheduled deposition in which a party seeks to
adduce evidence pursuant to this subsection. At such hearing, the moving party
shall state the grounds upon which the moving party believes such evidence may
be relevant and admissible.
(d) The court shall allow questioning described in subdivision (4)(a) of
this section if the court finds that such testimony could be relevant and
admissible at trial.
(5)(a) (4)(a) A sexual assault victim may request to have an advocate of
the victim's choosing present during a deposition under this section. The
prosecuting attorney shall inform the victim that the victim may make such
request as soon as reasonably practicable prior to the deposition. If the
victim wishes to have an advocate present, the victim shall, if reasonably
practicable, inform the prosecuting attorney if an advocate will be present,
and, if known, the advocate's identity and contact information. If so informed
by the victim, the prosecuting attorney shall notify the defendant as soon as
reasonably practicable.
(b) An advocate present at a deposition under this section shall not
interfere with the deposition or provide legal advice.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, the terms sexual assault victim,
victim, and advocate have the same meanings as in section 29-4309.
(6) (5) A deposition taken pursuant to this section may be used at the
trial by any party solely for the purpose of contradicting or impeaching the
testimony of the deponent as a witness.
Sec. 3. Original sections 27-412 and 29-1917, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-2-